Maryland, session 2025, HB0701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
SUBTITLE 6. GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWERS.
3–601.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWER”:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0701*

HOUSE BILL 701
(1) MEANS A COMBUSTION ENGINE–POWERED HANDHELD,
BACKPACK, OR WALK–BEHIND LEAF OR GRASS BLOWER, VACUUM, OR LEAF DEBRIS
REMOVAL DEVICE;
(2) INCLUDES AN ELECTRIC LEAF BLOWER CONNECTED TO A
GENERATOR POWERED BY GASOLINE OR OTHER FOSSIL FUELS; AND
(3) DOES NOT INCLUDE A STATIONARY OR TOW–BEHIND LEAF
VACUUM, MULCHER, DEBRIS LOADER DEVICE, OR SNOW BLOWER.
3–602.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) WILDLAND FIRE SUPPRESSION ACTIVITIES;
(2) PRESCRIBED BURN MANAGEMENT ACTIVITIES;
(3) FIRE–FIGHTING ACTIVITIES CARRIED OUT BY AUTHORIZED
PERSONNEL; OR
(4) EMERGENCY RESPONSE ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING ACTIVITIES TO
CLEAR SURFACES FOLLOWING A CRASH, CARRIED OUT BY AUTHORIZED PERSONNEL
AT A TRANSPORTATION FACILITY AS DEFINED IN § 3–101 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE.
3–603.
(A) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025, THE STATE MAY NOT PURCHASE A
GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWER.
(B) THE STATE, OR ANY CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR EMPLOYED BY
THE STATE, MAY NOT USE A GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWER:
(1) BEGINNING MAY 1, 2027, AND ENDING OCTOBER 1, 2027;
(2) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028, AND ENDING OCTOBER 1, 2028;
(3) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2029, AND ENDING OCTOBER 1, 2029;
AND
(4) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2030.

HOUSE BILL 701 3
3–604.
(A) BEGINNING SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, ANY PERSON THAT SELLS OR OFFERS
FOR SALE A GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWER IN THE STATE SHALL NOTIFY THE
PURCHASER OR POTENTIAL PURCHASER THAT:
(1) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, A PERSON MAY NOT PURCHASE A
GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWER IN THE STATE; AND
(2) SEVERAL JURISDICTIONS IN THE STATE HAVE ESTABLISHED
RESTRICTIONS AND PROHIBITIONS ON THE USE OF GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF
BLOWERS.
(B) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, A PERSON MAY NOT SELL OR OFFER FOR
SALE A GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWER IN THE STATE.
3–605.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT AFFECT THE AUTHORITY OF A COUNTY, A
MUNICIPALITY, OR ANY OTHER LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO ENACT STANDARDS THAT
ARE AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN THIS SUBTITLE
OR THAT BEGIN ON AN EARLIER DATE THAN THE DATES ESTABLISHED IN THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) THE STATE, OR ANY CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR EMPLOYED BY
THE STATE, SHALL COMPLY WITH LOCAL GOVERNMENT STANDARDS THAT ARE AT
LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN THIS SUBTITLE WHEN
MANAGING STATE PROPERTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.